Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ga_IE.dic
abraidís/HU
abtheach/HMDBUT
acalaí/HMDBUT
achomharcaidís/HU
achtainiam/HMDBUT
acmhainn/HMDBU
acmhainní/HBMDU
acraíochta/HMDU
adhartha/HBMDU
adhastar/HMDBUT
adhfhuafar/HB
adhlacóir/HMDBUT
aduain/HB
ae/HMDBUT
aeraidinimic/HMDBU
aeraíochta/HMDU
aeriompar/HMDBUT
aerthóirí/HMDBU
aeráide/HMDU
aerálaidís/HU
aerárthach/HMDBUT
aghaidheanna/HMDBU
agnóiseachas/HMDBUT
agróirí/HMDBU
agróra/HMDU
aibhsítear/HU
aiceannaithe/HBUMD
aiceantacht/HMDBU
aicmeach/HB
aicmiúchán/HMDBUT
aidréiní/B
aiféala/HMDBUT
aiféilin/HMDBU
aileacó/HMDBUT
ailearáin/HMDBU
ailleadóir/HMDBUT
ailpín/HMDBUT
ailínithe/HBMDU
aimhréiteach/HMDBUT
aimplitheoirí/HMDBU
ainbhirt/HMDU
ainchleachtadh/HMDBUT
aindleathacht/HMDBU
ainfhéinspéis/HMDBU
ainglice/HMDBU
aingíochta/HMDU
ainmní/HBMDUT
ainnire/HMDU
ainriochtach/HB
ainriochtán/HMDBUT
ainéistéisiú/HUBMDT
aireagal/HMDBUT
airgead/HMDBUT
airgeadh/HUBMDT
airitheach/HB
airleaca/U
aisdúichiú/HUBMDT
aiseagtha/HBMDU
aisfhuaimniú/HMDBUT
aistirí/HMDBU
aistreáin/HMDU
aistríodh/HU
aitheascal/HMDBUT
aithint/HMDBU
alabhreac/HB
alfraitsí/HMDBU
alpadh/HUBMDT
altluamhán/HMDBUT
altramaigh/HU
altán/HMDBUT
amas/HMDBUT
amchomhartha/HMDBUT
amhiarann/HMDBUT
amhránaíochta/HMDU
anachana/HMDBU
anagram/HMDBUT
anaithnide/HBMDU
anatamaíochta/HMDU
anbhuain/HMDBU
andúileach/HBMDUT
anglán/HMDBUT
angóra/HMDBUT
antashubstaint/HMDBU
antraipeolaí/HMDBUT
antráth/HMDBUT
análuithe/HMDBU
aonbheannaigh/HMDBU
aonchéileacha/B
aonchéileachas/HMDBUT
aonfhiúsach/HB
apacrafúla/B
apastrófa/HMDBU
araltas/HMDBUT
ard/HBMDUT
ardchíosanna/HMDBU
ardmháistir/HMDBUT
ardnósanna/HMDBU
ardrí/HMDBUT
ardóg/HMDBU
armónach/HBMDUT
asamat/HMDBUT
asarlaíocht/HMDBU
aslaithe/HBMDU
aslonnaithe/HBMDU
asúire/HMDBUT
athaimsígí/HU
athbhailte/HMDBU
athbhreoslú/HMDBUT
athchasaidís/HU
athchistiú/HMDBUT
athchóiriú/HMDBUT
athdhúchasacha/B
athfheidhmiú/HMDBUT
athfhorbairtí/HMDBU
athfhreagra/HMDBUT
athluaite/HBUMD
athluchtaítear/HU
athléiriú/HMDBUT
athphósta/HBUMD
athraitheas/HMDBUT
athraonaidís/HU
athshonrú/HMDBUT
athshreangaithe/HBUMD
atáirgthe/HBMDU
atóg/HU
aíochtlann/HMDBU
bacóg/US
banadhaltraigh/US
bardaigh/US
beachtaithe/SU
bharrainn/EU
bior-róis/US
blaisféimí/SU
bocsaera/US
boltaí/US
Botsuáine/S
brionnóirí/US
brionnóra/US
brístíní/US
buachan/US
bunchúiseanna/US
bábán/US
béasaigh/S
caid/US
caighdeánaithe/SU
callshaothacha/S
canbhás/US
caonach/US
casnóige/US
ceacharthachta/US
ceartáin/US
ceatha/US
chniotála/U
ciandacht/US
cineama/US
claonacha/S
claonbhreith/US
clutharú/US
clóbh/US
cnódhoinn/SU
coillteoireacht/US
coinníollaí/S
comhairce/US
comhathraithis/US
comhriachtain/US
comhshínis/US
contúirteach/S
corónacha/SU
cradhscalacha/S
crochadáin/US
crocáin/US
créip/US
cróinéir/US
cuimleála/US
cuntaoise/US
cáiteora/US
cógaisíocht/US
cómhargáil/US
cúpláin/US
cúplálaim/USI
d'eascair/U
dabhcha/US
dea-mhéiní/S
dearlacaim/USA
deirfiúr/US
dhreasaí/U
dioscaí/US
discréid/US
dolaim/USA
dothreáiteachta/US
drithligh/SU
drúip/US
duibhéan/US
díbeartaí/S
díchollaithe/SU
díonbhrollach/US
dóighiúlacht/US
dúléime/US
eachtraí/HBMDUT
eagarfhocal/HMDBUT
eagraithe/HBMDU
ealaíne/HMDU
earbóir/HMDBUT
earcaígí/HU
easair/HMDBU
eascarthach/HB
eascraí/HMDBU
easmailt/HMDBU
eastát/HMDBUT
eindéimeach/HB
einime/HMDBU
eipeagraim/HMDBU
eisceadh/HMDBUT
eisiachta/HBU
eismheánach/HB
eisíocaíochta/HMDU
eitleoige/HMDU
eitriú/HUBMDT
eití/HBMDU
eolaíochtaí/HMDBU
fabht/MDBUS
fadréimsí/BS
faigín/MDBUS
faisisteacha/BS
falcaire/MDBUS
falscaithe/MDBUS
faoistiní/MDBUS
fathach/MDBUS
feabhsúcháin/MDBUS
feamainní/BS
fearna/MDBUS
feifí/BS
feighlíoch/BS
feiseanna/MDBUS
feolamáin/MDBUS
fhlúirsí/U
fiaclóireacht/MDBUS
fiarsceabhacha/BS
fillteoirí/MDBUS
fionnachreatha/MDUS
fionnghlas/BS
fiontar/MDBUS
firín/MDBUS
fo-bhailtí/BS
fochraoibhe/MDUS
foclach/BS
fogasa/BS
foirfiú/MDBUS
foirneála/MDUS
foiscealaigh/MDBUS
fomhuireán/MDBUS
fonóidigh/MDBUS
forchás/MDBUS
fordhath/MDBUS
forimeallaí/BS
forsheoltachta/MDUS
forthroime/BS
fosfair/MDUS
fosú/MDBUS
fotheaghráin/MDBUS
fraochlaigh/US
fuairnéalach/BSMDU
fual-lamhnán/MDBUS
fuarchásaimh/MDUS
fuarfhuilteacha/BS
fuirste/BSMDU
fulaingthe/MDUSB
fáiteallaithe/MDBUS
fáltasaí/BS
fáthchiallaí/BS
féige/MDBUS
féilí/MDBUS
féinphortráid/MDBUS
fíneáltacht/MDBUS
fíniúnach/BS
fístaifeadáin/MDBUS
físí/MDBUS
fógróir/MDBUS
fótóin/MDBUS
fútráil/MDBUS
gairis/US
galacha/S
gealbhan/US
gealtlanna/US
geolta/US
ghníomhaínn/FU
glaomaireacht/US
glasarnacht/US
gnaíúlachta/US
gníomhaireachtaí/US
gradamaigh/S
griothal/US
grámhara/S
gáitéirí/US
gátair/US
iambach/HB
iarchonn/HMDBUT
iarnáiltear/HU
iarnálaithe/HMDBU
iarphroinne/HMDU
iasainteach/HMDBUT
icisihéadráin/HMDBU
idirbheartú/HMDBUT
idirbhlianta/HMDBU
idirchur/HMDBUT
idirlín/HMDU
idirlíon/HMDBUT
idéalaí/HBMDUT
ilchuideachta/HMDBU
ilchumas/HMDBUT
ildiachaí/HMDBUT
ilsleasaí/B
imdhíontar/HU
imeall/HMDBUT
imlíneach/HB
imoibreoir/HMDBUT
impleacht/HMDBU
imscaoileadh/HUBMDT
imscaoiligí/HU
in-bhithmhillte/HB
inbheirthe/HB
indibhidiúlachta/HMDU
infeirithe/HBMDU
infhilleadh/HMDBUT
infreastruchtúr/HMDBUT
inléiteachta/HMDU
innill/HMDBU
inpháirteach/HB
inscní/HMDBU
insealbhóir/HMDBUT
intleacht/HMDBU
intreoirí/HMDBU
intriacht/HMDBU
intéirneachta/HMDU
iolrúchán/HMDBUT
iomaitheoirí/HMDBU
iombhagairt/HMDBU
iompairc/HMDBU
iompála/HMDBUT
iomrascálaí/HMDBUT
ionchuiridís/HU
ionchurtha/HBMDU
ionlach/HMDBUT
ionlainne/HMDU
ionraí/HMDBU
ionsoilsithe/HBUMD
iontrálaí/HMDBUT
iorras/HMDBUT
iriseoireacht/HMDBU
iseatóp/HMDBUT
maighdeoige/S
maolchinn/S
meala/S
meánaicmí/S
miontaí/S
mothú/S
méadlachán/S
mínithigh/S
móráirimh/S
ochtaihéadrán/HMDBUT
ochtanna/HMDBU
ocrachán/HMDBUT
oibil/HMDBU
oideachasóir/HMDBUT
oifigiúil/HB
oigheanna/HMDBU
oilteacht/HMDBU
oirbheart/HMDBUT
oireas/HMDBUT
oirmhinnithe/HBUMD
oirmhinnígí/HU
ollamh/HMDBUT
ollbhearta/HMDBU
ollstailceanna/HMDBU
optaic/HMDBU
optamú/HMDBUT
ordanás/HMDBUT
ortanormail/HMDBU
oscartha/HB
osclóir/HMDBUT
otrachta/HMDU
painteon/US
Parlaimint/S
pháirtí/U
piorra/US
pléadálaim/USI
pocléim/US
preicleacháin/US
preideacáide/US
prúntach/US
puntán/US
póiteacha/S
sacrailéid/ST
saighead/ST
saincheist/ST
saiseanna/S
samhaltais/ST
saorcheada/ST
seach-chonairí/S
seacha/ST
sealla/ST
seandéanaimh/ST
searbh-bhiolar/S
searmanais/ST
seimineáir/ST
seoilín/ST
seápáil/ST
sillte/ST
siombóis/ST
sistéim/ST
siúite/ST
sleamchúis/ST
slogaire/ST
sluamhair/S
slí/ST
snoíodóra/ST
sodamacht/ST
sollúin/ST
srama/ST
srannach/S
sruáin/ST
suibscríbhinn/ST
sáibh/ST
séadghlais/ST
síleálacha/S
sínteacht/ST
síothlóra/ST
súilíocht/ST
taespúnóga/US
tanaíocha/US
tarscaoil/US
tharchuire/U
timire/US
tiomnóir/US
tonnchosc/US
traigéideacha/S
triuf/US
tróit/US
tualangacht/US
téiglíochta/US
tóiriúla/S
uailleacha/HMDBU
uaillmhianta/HMDBU
uamtha/HBMDU
uasal/HBMDUT
uaschúirteanna/HMDBU
uathach/HB
uathfhuaimnithe/HBMDU
uathphíolótaí/HMDBU
uchtbharr/HMDBUT
uileloiscthí/HMDBU
uimhirphláta/HMDBUT
uiríoll/HMDBUT
uiséirí/HMDBU
ultraivialait/HB
umhal/HBMDUT
urlactar/HU
urnaí/HMDBU
urraí/HMDBU
urtheilgean/HMDBUT
urtlaigh/HMDBU
ábharaíoch/HB
áilteora/HMDU
áinsíocha/B
áiseach/HB
ársaitheoir/HMDBUT
átagraf/HMDBUT
áthanna/HMDBU
áthasacha/B
éagmais/HMDBU
éagmaiseach/HB
éagsúlachta/HMDU
éarlais/HMDBU
éarthaigh/HMDBU
éastraigin/HMDBU
éiclipteach/HBMDUT
éigeas/HMDBUT
éigse/HMDBU
éiritheach/HB
ídídís/HU
íocaíochtaí/HMDBU
íomháineacht/HMDBU
íorpais/HMDBU
íosluach/HMDBUT
ísleoige/HMDU
ógbhan/HMDU
ógchiontóir/HMDBUT
óinsiúla/B
óspairtí/HMDBU
óstaíocht/HMDBU
úfó/HMDBUT
úinéirí/HMDBU
úranailíse/HMDU
úráiniam/HMDBUT
